North Dakota, session 69, SB2079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 25-01-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
25-01-01. Definitions.
In this title, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:
1. "Licensed physician" means an individual licensed under the laws of this state to practice
medicine and also means a medical officer of the government of the United States while in this
state in the performance of the physician's official duties.
2. "Mentally ill individual" means an individual having a psychiatric or other disease which
substantially impairs the individual's mental health.
3. "North Dakota vision services - school for the blind" means the North Dakota vision services -
school for the blind as maintained under section 25-06-01.
4. "School for the deaf" means the school for the deaf of North Dakota.
5. "State hospital" means the state hospital for the mentally ill.
6. "Superintendent" means the superintendent of the state hospital, of the life skills and transition
center, of North Dakota vision services - school for the blind, or of the school for the deaf, as
the case may be.
7. "Supervising officer" means the commissioner of the department of health and human
services or designee or the superintendent of public instruction, as the case may be.
8. "Tier 1 mental health professional" means a tier 1a or tier 1b mental health professional.
a. A tier 1a mental health professional is a psychiatrist licensed under chapter 43-17 or a
psychologist licensed under chapter 43-32.
b. A tier 1b mental health professional is a licensed physician or a physician assistant
licensed under chapter 43-17 or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under
chapter 43-12.
9. "Tier 2 mental health professional" means a tier 2a or a tier 2b mental health professional.
a. A tier 2a mental health professional is an independent clinician who is a licensed clinical
social worker licensed under chapter 43-41, a licensed professional clinical counselor or
licensed professional counselor licensed under chapter 43-47, or a licensed marriage
and family therapist licensed under chapter 43-53.
b. A tier 2b mental health professional is an addiction counselor licensed under chapter
43-45 or a registered nurse licensed under chapter 43-12.

S. B. NO. 2079 - PAGE 2
10. "Tier 3 mental health professional" means a licensed associate professional counselor
licensed under chapter 43-47, a licensed master social worker or licensed baccalaureate
social worker licensed under chapter 43-41, a licensed professional counselor licensed under
chapter 43-47, an associate marriage and family therapist licensed under chapter 43-53, an
occupational therapist licensed under chapter 43-40, a licensed practical nurse licensed under
chapter 43-12, a behavior analyst licensed or registered under chapter 43-32, a vocational
rehabilitation counselor practicing under chapter 50-06.1, a school psychologist, or a human
relations counselor.
11. "Tier 4 mental health professional" means a direct care associate or, technician, or certified
peer support specialist.

S. B. NO. 2079 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2079.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State